Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Mixed Martial Arts

§ 6025.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Contestant” means an individual who competes in a mixed martial arts match, including an exhibition. “Contestant” includes both amateur and professional mixed martial arts competitors.

“Director” means the Director of the Vermont Office of Professional Regulation.

“Event” or “mixed martial arts event” means a mixed martial arts match or two or more mixed martial arts matches held at the same location on the same or consecutive dates.

“Exhibition” means an engagement in which the contestants show or display their skills without necessarily striving to win.

“Match” or “mixed martial arts match” means any occurrence in which a mixed martial arts contestant competes against another mixed martial arts contestant using mixed martial arts. “Match” or “mixed martial arts match” includes amateur matches and exhibitions.

“Mixed martial arts” means unarmed combat involving the use, subject to any applicable limits set forth in this subchapter and in any rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, of a combination of techniques, including grappling, kicking, and striking, from different disciplines of martial arts. Mixed martial arts includes kickboxing, pankration, Muay Thai, and extreme martial arts. Mixed martial arts does not include boxing.

“Office” means the Vermont Office of Professional Regulation.

“Participant” means individuals who participate, directly or indirectly, in mixed martial arts matches, including managers, referees, match makers, seconds, corners, and judges. “Participant” does not include spectators and audience members.

“Promoter” means any person, club, corporation, or association and, in the case of a corporate promoter, includes any officer, director, employee, or stockholder thereof, who produces, arranges, or stages any mixed martial arts match.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6026.
Jurisdiction of Office.

The Office shall have and exercise sole discretion, management, control, and supervision over all mixed martial arts events taking place within the State. No mixed martial arts event shall take place within the State except in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter and the rules adopted by the Office.

Every license issued under this subchapter shall be subject to the rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6027.
Director; powers; duties.

In addition to the powers and duties of the Director, as established in this subchapter and in 3 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3, the Director shall have the following powers and duties:

provide information to applicants for obtaining a license;

receive applications for licenses; grant licenses to applicants qualified under this subchapter and in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter; renew licenses; and deny, revoke, suspend, reinstate, or condition licenses as directed by an Administrative Law Officer;

administer the inspection of facilities where a mixed martial arts event is to be held and the records associated with the event;

administer fees collected under this subchapter;

collect taxes and bonds in accordance with this subchapter and any rules adopted pursuant this subchapter;

explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public; and

refer all disciplinary matters to an Administrative Law Officer.

The Director, in consultation with the advisors appointed in accordance with this subchapter, shall adopt rules necessary to perform the Director’s duties under this subchapter and shall establish safety standards for the protection of contestants, participants, promoters, and the public. The rules adopted by the Director in accordance with this subchapter shall, at a minimum, include the following:

rules for the conduct and holding of amateur and professional mixed martial arts events;

requirements and qualifications to be eligible for licenses for anyone involved, indirectly or directly, in a mixed martial arts event, including promoters, contestants, and participants, and to be eligible for event licenses;

requirements for the collection, retention, and remission of bonds provided by promoters as a condition of licensure or of an event permit;

requirements for promoter reports to the Office, including reports following a mixed martial arts event and for promoter payment of the event tax;

requirements for medical examinations of participants and contestants to be performed prior to licensure and renewal;

requirements for medical examinations of contestants and participants before, during, and after mixed martial arts matches or events;

exemptions for certain mixed martial arts events;

requirements for the inspection of facilities where a mixed martial arts event is to be held and of associated records; and

all other requirements necessary for the safe conduct of mixed martial arts matches and events.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6028.
Advisors.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two individuals to serve as advisors in matters related to mixed martial arts regulation. Both advisors shall be an individual with at least three years’ experience in mixed martial arts as a promoter, participant, or contestant. The advisor appointees shall be appointed for staggered five-year terms and shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisors appointed under this section in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter. The advisors shall be entitled to compensation and necessary expenses in the amount provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

for attendance at any meeting called by the Director for this purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6029.
Amateur events; exemption for schools; exemptions.

All amateur mixed martial arts events shall be regulated by the Office in accordance with this subchapter and rules adopted under this subchapter except for amateur mixed martial events conducted by a school, college, or university.

The Director may, by rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, exempt from the application of these rules mixed martial arts events in which there is minimal or no contact between contestants, for which there is no remuneration for participation, and for which no tickets are sold or admission fees charged.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6030.
Contestants; licensing; examination.

Contestant license.

No individual shall participate as a contestant in a mixed martial arts event, which includes a sole match, in the State without first having obtained a license from the Office.

Every contestant licensed in accordance with this subchapter shall be subject to the rules adopted by the Director.

A fee may be assessed for a contestant license in accordance with section 6033 of this subchapter.

An individual who wants to be licensed under this subsection shall apply for a contestant license in the manner specified by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, accompanied by payment of the required fee.

Licenses shall be renewed every year on a date set by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter. Licenses shall be subject to the provisions of this subchapter and to all rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

Medical examination; report.

Each contestant shall be examined by a physician, who is licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 26 V.S.A. chapter 33, at the time and in accordance with rules adopted by the Director in accordance with this subchapter.

No contestant shall be granted a license or permitted to renew a license without first submitting a report from a physician, who is licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 26 V.S.A. chapter 33 and who performed an examination in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter, certifying the contestant is in appropriate physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts event. Reports from an examining physician shall be submitted directly to the Office by the examining physician and shall contain such information as required by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter. The examining physician shall provide an assessment in the report of the contestant’s physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts match.

No contestant shall participate in a mixed martial arts match unless:

the contestant has been examined not more than twelve hours before the match by a physician licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 26 V.S.A. chapter 33 and who performed the medical examination in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter; and

the physician who performed the examination certifies in writing to the referee of the match that the contestant is in appropriate physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts match.

Fees for the pre-match examination shall be paid by the promoter of the match. In addition to providing the certification to the referee on the day of the event, the contestant shall submit the certification of the examining physician to the Office within 48 hours following the mixed martial arts match for which the physician provided the examination.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6031.
Promoters.

Promoter license.

No person shall hold or conduct a mixed martial arts event, which includes a sole match, in the State without first having obtained a license from the Office.

A person who wants to be licensed under this subsection shall apply for a promoter license in the manner specified by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, accompanied by payment of the required fee.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years on a date set by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter. Licenses shall be subject to the provisions of this subchapter and to all rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

In addition to the bond required under this subchapter, a fee may be assessed for a promoter license in accordance with section 6033 of this subchapter.

Before any promoter license is granted or renewed, the applicant shall execute and file with the Office a bond to the State in the amount of $10,000.00, to be conditioned upon the faithful performance by the applicant of the provisions of this subchapter and the payment of the taxes imposed under this subchapter. The bond shall be in a form with sureties satisfactory to the Office. No promoter license shall be renewed unless this bond has been renewed and filed with the Board.

Event license.

No mixed martial arts event, including a sole match, shall be held by any promoter licensed under this subchapter unless the promoter has obtained from the Office an event license to hold the event at least two weeks prior to the first day of the event. The application to the Office for an event license shall be in such form, with such information, and at such place as the Office may, by rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, prescribe.

A fee may be assessed for this match or event license in accordance with section 6033 of this subchapter. The Office may charge a separate event license fee for each day of an event.

No event license shall be granted to any promoter who is not licensed in the State; whose license is suspended, disciplined, or revoked in any state or jurisdiction; or who is delinquent in paying a tax that has been assessed pursuant to section 6039 of this subchapter.

No event license shall be granted until the Office performs an inspection of the facilities where the mixed martial arts event is to be held and of records associated with the event.

No event license shall be renewed. A separate event license shall be obtained for each event, including for a sole match.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6032.
Participants.

No individual shall participate, either directly or indirectly, as a participant in a mixed martial arts event, including a sole match, in the State without first having obtained a license from the Office.

A fee may be assessed for a participant license in accordance with section 6033 of this subchapter.

Every participant licensed in accordance with this subchapter shall be subject to the rules adopted by the Director.

An individual who wants to be licensed under this section shall apply for a participant license in the manner specified by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, accompanied by payment of the required fee.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years on a date set by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter. Licensees shall be subject to the provisions of this subchapter and to all rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6033.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated by this subchapter shall be subject to the following fees:

Application: (A) Promoter license $500.00 (B) Event license $250.00 (C) Contestant license $ 25.00 (D) Participant license $ 25.00 (2) Biennial renewal for managers, seconds referees, and judges $ 25.00 (3) Biennial renewal for promoters $500.00 (4) Annual renewal for contestants $ 25.00 (5) Late fees set pursuant to .

3 V.S.A. § 127(d)(1)

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6034.
Renewal.

General provisions. A licensee shall apply to renew the license prior to the expiration of the current license. The Director shall send a reminder to licensees prior to the expiration of their licenses. The Office may charge, in addition to the license fee, a late fee to licensees who do not apply to renew a license until after the license is expired.

Renewal deadlines.

Licenses for participants and promoters shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the required fees and in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter.

Licenses for contestants shall be renewed every year upon payment of the required fees and in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6035.
Medical insurance.

Promoters licensed in accordance with this subchapter shall carry medical insurance covering all contestants who participate in an event, including a sole match, conducted by the promoter.

The cost of the medical insurance, including deductibles and premiums, shall be borne by the promoter.

The promoter shall obtain medical insurance coverage in an amount to be determined by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter that shall cover the expenses for the treatment of any injuries the contestant may suffer as a result of a mixed martial arts event.

The medical insurance coverage shall extend for at least six months following the date of the mixed martial arts event.

No mixed martial arts event shall be approved in the State unless the promoter is in full compliance with the requirements of this section concerning medical insurance coverage.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6036.
Medical exam.

The Director shall adopt rules for medical examination of contestants and participants, as needed, including examinations before, during, and after a match or event and as a condition of licensure under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6037.
Referees.

No mixed martial arts event, including a sole match, shall take place in Vermont without a referee present and overseeing the event in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter.

The sole arbiter in the ring in a mixed martial arts match shall be the referee, licensed as a participant in Vermont, who shall govern the match in accordance with the rules adopted by the Director under this subchapter. The referee shall have full power to stop the match whenever the referee deems it advisable because of the physical condition of a contestant, when one of the contestants is clearly outclassed by an opponent, or for other reasonable cause.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6038.
Medical assistance at events.

Physician. Every promoter shall have in attendance at every mixed martial arts match at least one physician who is licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 26 V.S.A. chapter 33. The physician shall perform medical examinations of the contestants not more than twelve hours before the beginning of the match and shall certify in writing to the referee whether or not the contestant is in appropriate physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts match.

Ambulance. Every promoter shall have at every mixed martial arts match an ambulance containing the standard medical equipment necessary to treat cerebral injuries. If the ambulance leaves an event, no other mixed martial arts match may commence or resume until the ambulance returns. The promoter shall stop or delay a match until an ambulance is present.

Upon the recommendation of the physician present during a mixed martial arts event, a contestant shall be required to undergo an ophthalmological and neurological examination after each match in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter.

The cost of such an examination shall be borne by the promoter of the event.

The physician shall provide a certified writing of the examination findings to the referee and the contestant.

Within 48 hours after receiving the examination, the contestant shall submit the physician’s certified writing to the Office.

If the physician, after an examination in accordance with this section and rules adopted under this subchapter, certifies that the contestant is not in a physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts match, the contestant shall not be permitted to engage in another match until a subsequent examination is conducted in accordance with rules adopted under this subchapter and a physician certifies that the contestant is in an appropriate physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts match. The physician providing the subsequent examination does not need to be the same physician who provided the examination at the mixed martial arts match.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6039.
Tax; post-event report by promoter.

Every promoter shall, not later than seven days after the conclusion of a mixed martial arts event, submit a post-event report to the Office in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter. The report shall include the exact number of tickets to the event sold, the amount of gross and net receipts from the event, and any other facts as the Director may by rule require. The promoter shall report on tickets sold to an entire event not to an individual match within an event.

Every promoter shall, not later than seven days after the conclusion of a mixed martial arts event, pay to the Office by certified check a tax of five percent of the receipts from tickets, admission fees, and sponsorships after all costs from the event and any other State and federal taxes thereon have been paid. The promoter shall pay the tax on the receipts from the entire event. This tax shall be deposited in the Professional Regulation Fee Fund and used to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

If the report required under this section and the accompanying tax are not paid within the seven days required, the Office may examine, or cause to be examined, the books and records of the promoter and any corporation on behalf of which the promoter held the event.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6040.
Unprofessional conduct.

All persons. All persons licensed under this subchapter are subject to 3 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3, including the unprofessional conduct items established under

3 V.S.A. § 129a

.

Contestants. In addition to the items set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, it shall be unprofessional conduct for a contestant to do any of the following:

engage in a mixed martial arts match after a physician, licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 23 or 26 V.S.A. chapter 33, certifies, following an annual examination or an examination before, during, or within seven days after a match and carried out in accordance with this subchapter and rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter, that the contestant is not in a physical condition to engage in a mixed martial arts match;

engage in a mixed martial arts match when suspended or prohibited from competing in a mixed martial arts match by any entity that regulates mixed martial arts;

engage in a mixed martial arts match when the contestant’s license to engage in mixed martial arts, as a contestant, promoter, or participant, is suspended in any other state or jurisdiction;

engage in a mixed martial arts match less than 30 days after competing as a contestant in another mixed martial arts match;

engage in a mixed martial arts match less than 60 days after having been knocked out in a mixed martial arts match or less than 30 days after having been technically knocked out in a mixed martial arts match; or

any other activity as established by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

Promoters. In addition to the items set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, it shall be unprofessional conduct for a promoter to do any of the following:

fail to submit a required report or information to the Office within the time period and with the information, taxes, and fees required under this subchapter and in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter;

directly or indirectly have any financial interest in an individual competing in a mixed martial arts match arranged by the promoter;

engage a contestant who is suspended or prohibited from competing in mixed martial arts matches by any state or jurisdiction to compete in a match held by the promoter;

conduct a mixed martial arts match with no ambulance present;

conduct a mixed martial arts match with no physician present;

conduct a mixed martial arts match without a referee present; or

any other activity as established by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

Participants. In addition to the items set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, it shall be unprofessional conduct for a participant to do any of the following:

for a referee, to unreasonably fail to comply with the rules adopted by the Director in accordance with this subchapter for the conduct of a mixed martial arts match;

for a referee, match-maker, or judge, to directly or indirectly have any financial interest in an individual competing in a mixed martial arts match at which the referee, match-maker, or judge is acting as a judge, match-maker, or referee; or

any other activity as established by the Director in rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6041.
Inspections.

The Director or designee may inspect facilities, including the ring, where a mixed martial arts match is to be held, before or during any match or event, and the records required for each licensee and the event or match in accordance with this subchapter and rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter. The Director or designee may suspend an event license immediately for failure to comply with this subchapter or with any rules adopted in accordance with this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6042.
Age.

No individual under 18 years of age shall engage in a mixed martial arts event, including a sole match, in which money, a prize or purse, or other form of monetary compensation is offered or given to any contestant.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.

§ 6043.
Injunction.

The Director may, in addition to other remedies available under law, bring an action in a court of this State to enjoin a person from continuing any violation of this subchapter or doing any acts in furtherance thereof and for any other relief that the court deems appropriate.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 69

, § 15.